Idaho, session 2025, H0088.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 18-5614, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
18-5614. SOLICITING COMMERCIAL SEXUAL ACTIVITY. (1) A person is
guilty of soliciting commercial sexual activity when he or she:
(a) Pays, offers to pay, or agrees to pay another person a fee for the
purpose of engaging in sexual contact; or
(b) Offers a third person to engage in, or agrees to provide a third per-
son to engage in, sexual contact in return for a fee.
(2) Soliciting commercial sexual activity shall be a misdemeanor, pro-
vided that a second or subsequent conviction therefor shall be a felony. Any
person convicted of a misdemeanor violation of this section shall be sen-
tenced to a minimum period of confinement of five (5) days in jail and may
be sentenced to up to one (1) year in jail or fined up to two thousand dol-
lars ($2,000), or both. The minimum period of confinement shall be served in
a county jail, and a court shall not have the power to suspend, withhold, re-
tain jurisdiction over, or commute the minimum period of confinement imposed
pursuant to this section felony.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.